Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.580

Extracurricular activities—Opportunity gap reduction plan.

(1) Beginning June 1, 2021, and by June 1st annually thereafter, a school district with a high school that does not meet or beat one or more of the opportunity gap reduction goals described in RCW 28A.320.560 or 28A.320.570 must develop, submit, and implement an extracurricular activity opportunity gap reduction plan.

(2) The plan must be formatted and submitted as directed by the office of the superintendent of public instruction.

(3) The plan must be published as required under RCW 28A.325.050.

(4) When developing the plan, the school district shall review recommendations from the associated student body executive board.

(5) The office of the superintendent of public instruction may review the plans submitted under this section and provide feedback and technical assistance to help school districts meet the requirements of chapter 13, Laws of 2020.

[ 2020 c 13 s 7.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2020 c 13: "(1) The legislature finds that:

(a) Interscholastic athletics and activities are a vital part of enriching students' educational experiences and developing students into responsible adults;

(b) Research supports the theory that students who participate in extracurricular activities have:

(i) Better grades and higher standardized test scores;

(ii) Increased school attendance;

(iii) Improved health and wellness; and

(iv) Positively enhanced educational experience[s];

(c) Many school districts require associated student body cards to participate in extracurricular activities and many school districts charge a fee for associated student body cards;

(d) Many school districts require a participation fee for some extracurricular activities; and

(e) The fees associated with obtaining associated student body cards and with participating in extracurricular activities may create an obstacle to participation in extracurricular activities by students who are low income.

(2) The legislature intends to reduce the obstacle to participation in extracurricular activities caused by the fees charged to students who are low income by creating equitable access to opportunities that improve academic, social, and emotional outcomes, collecting and analyzing data, and addressing barriers to extracurricular activities." [ 2020 c 13 s 1.]